Utah statutes.
19-6-814.   Local health department responsibility.

(1)  A local health department that has received an application for partial reimbursement from a recycler shall within 15 calendar days after receiving the application:

(a)  review the application for completeness;

(b)  conduct an on-site investigation of the recycler's waste tire use if the application is the initial application of the recycler; and

(c)  submit the recycler's application for partial reimbursement together with a brief written report of the results of the investigation and the dollar amount approved for payment to the Division of Finance.

(2)  If the local health department approves a dollar amount for partial reimbursement which is less than the amount requested by the recycler, the local health department must submit its written report of the investigation and recommendation to the recycler at least five days prior to submitting the report and recommendation to the Division of Finance.

